Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.582

Term papers, theses, dissertations, sale of prohibited—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the words used in RCW 28B.10.580 through 28B.10.584 shall have the meaning given in this section:

(1) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.

(2) "Assignment" means any specific written, recorded, pictorial, artistic, or other academic task, including but not limited to term papers, theses, dissertations, essays, and reports, that is intended for submission to any postsecondary institution in fulfillment of the requirements of a degree, diploma, certificate, or course of study at any such educational institution.

(3) "Prepare" means to create, write, or in any way produce in whole or substantial part a term paper, thesis, dissertation, essay, report, or other assignment for a monetary fee.

(4) "Postsecondary institution" means any university, college, or other postsecondary educational institution.

[ 1981 c 23 s 2; 1979 c 43 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 23: See note following RCW 28B.10.580.

Severability—1979 c 43: See note following RCW 28B.10.580.